Massachusetts, session 194th, S953.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 15F of chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “not-for-credit”, in lines 11 and 
12, 21, 22 and 23, 28 and 29, 31 and 35, each time it appears, the following words:- and credit-
bearing. 
SECTION 2. Said section 15F of said chapter 15A, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by striking out, in line 24, the words “not for-credit” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- not-for-credit and credit-bearing.